District of Columbia statutes.
38-907

Acceptance by Board of Education of donations.

The Board of Education is authorized to receive any donations or contributions that may be made for the benefit of the public schools of the District of Columbia, and to apply the same in such manner as in their opinion shall be best calculated to effect the object of the donors; the Board of Education to account for all funds so received.

History

R.S., D.C., § 283
June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 316, ch. 3446, § 2
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-26, § 3, 22 DCR 2467

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2207.
1973 Ed., § 31-1109.